Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1045.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1414.11(a) introductory paragraph, (1) and (2) of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, are amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 1414.11. Seizure Recognition and Related First Aid Training.--(a) Beginning with the school year [2022-2023] 2025-2026 2026-2027 and [each year] every two THREE years thereafter:(1) A school nurse [may] shall complete a Department of Health-approved online course of instruction or in-person training for school nurses regarding management of a student <--<--12345678910111213141516171819 with seizures that includes information about seizure recognition, a seizure action plan and related first aid.(2) A professional employe of a school entity, other than a school nurse, whose duties at the school entity include direct contact with students [may] shall complete a Department of Health-approved online course of instruction or in-person training regarding awareness of a student with seizures that includes information about seizure recognition and related first aid.* * *(b.1) Nothing in this section shall be construed to create, establish or expand any civil liability on the part of any school entity or any school entity employe. The provisions of 42 Pa.C.S. §§ 8332 (relating to emergency response provider and bystander good Samaritan civil immunity) and 8337.1 (relating to civil immunity of school officers or employees relating to emergency care, first aid and rescue) shall apply to a school entity employe who provides treatment to a student experiencing a seizure in a manner consistent with the policy adopted by the school entity.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1045PN3290 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122